Washington statutes.
RCW 15.19.030

Adoption of rules.

In addition to the powers conferred on the director under this chapter, the director has the power to adopt rules:

(1) Establishing certification requirements for American ginseng (Panax quinquefolius L.).

Certification factors include:

(a) Place of origin;

(b) Whether the ginseng is wild or cultivated;

(c) Weight; and

(d) Date of harvest;

and may include whether the ginseng meets requirements for freedom from infestation by plant pests as required by the importing country;

(2) Requiring the registration of ginseng growers and of dealers who purchase and/or sell American ginseng for the purpose of foreign export; and

(3) Requiring that records be maintained by ginseng growers and by dealers who purchase or sell American ginseng for the purpose of foreign export.

The director may adopt any other rules necessary to comply with the requirements of the convention on international trade in endangered species of wild fauna and flora (27 U.S.T. 108); the endangered species act of 1973, as amended (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.); and 50 C.F.R. Part 23 (1995), as they existed on June 6, 1996, or a subsequent date as may be provided by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section.

[ 1998 c 154 s 23.]